Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 32
LEGEND DRUG CODE IMPRINT

Sec.

§ 37-3201. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 37-3202. Code imprint required. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 37-3203. List of legend drugs provided. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 37-3204. Exemptions may be permitted. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 37-3205. Seizure. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 259, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.